District of Columbia statutes.
4-414

Authorization of grants to develop satellite child development home programs.

The Department is hereby authorized to make grants to private agencies that work with child development homes and to licensed child development centers for the purpose of developing or operating satellite child development home programs.

Sept. 19, 1979, D.C. Law 3-16, § 15, 26 DCR 20
Mar. 15, 1985, D.C. Law 5-174, § 2(c), 32 DCR 743
1981 Ed., § 3-314.
1973 Ed., § 3-314.